tests/voicing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../crh.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../crh.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Voicing alternations (no voicing, a)":
    tüs<n><nom> : tüs 
    tüs<n><px3sp><nom> : tüsü
    tüs<n><loc> : tüste
    baş<n><nom> : baş 
    baş<n><dat> : başqa 
    baş<n><px3sp><dat> : başına
    baş<n><px3sp><nom> : başı
    baş<n><loc> : başta
    tiş<n><nom> : tiş 
    tiş<n><px3sp><nom> : tişi
    tiş<n><loc> : tişte
    at¹<n><nom> : at
    at¹<n><loc> : atta
    at¹<n><px3sp><nom> : atı

  "Voicing alternations (voicing, b)":
    qas<n><nom> : qas 
    qas<n><px3sp><nom> : qazı
    qas<n><loc> : qazda
    uç<n><nom> : uç 
    uç<n><px3sp><nom> : ucı
    uç<n><loc> : ucda
    garaş<n><nom> : garaş
    garaş<n><px3sp><nom> : garajı
    garaş<n><loc> : garajda
    küs<n><nom> : küs 
    küs<n><px3sp><nom> : küzü
    küs<n><loc> : küzde
    at²<n><nom> : at 
    at²<n><px3sp><nom> : adı
    at²<n><loc> : adda

  "Voicing alternations (voicing, c)":
    tüp<n><nom> : tüp 
    tüp<n><px3sp><nom> : tübü
    tüp<n><loc> : tüpte
    kitap<n><nom> : kitap 
    kitap<n><dat> : kitapqa
    kitap<n><px3sp><nom> : kitabı
    kitap<n><loc> : kitapta
    bilek<n><nom> : bilek 
    bilek<n><px3sp><nom> : bilegi 
    bilek<n><loc> : bilekte
    qulaq<n><nom> : qulaq 
    qulaq<n><px3sp><nom> : qulağı
    qulaq<n><loc> : qulaqta

  "Voicing alternations (voicing, d)":
    koy<n><nom> : koy 
    koy<n><px3sp><nom> : koyu
    koy<n><loc> : koyda
    araba<n><nom> : araba 
    araba<n><px3sp><nom> : arabası
    araba<n><loc> : arabada
 
  "Miscellaneous":
    mektep<n><px3sp><loc> : mektebinde
    birlik<n><nom> : birlik
    birlik<n><px3sp><nom> : birligi
    doğ<v><tv><ifi><p3><sg> : doğdı
    doğ<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : doğğan
    doğ<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : doğ
    maqsat<n><px3sp><nom> : maqsadı
    maqsat<n><nom> : maqsat
    maqsat<n><pl><nom> : maqsatlar
    maqsat<n><loc> : maqsatta
